test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NID_O_NoExtra_skatig_gt-norm.yaml
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: skatigenhimishiniibanag
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: skatigenhimishiniibaning
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: skatigenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: skatigenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: skatigenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niskatigensimishinaanibanan
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niskatigensimishinaanibanag
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niskatigensimishinaanibaning
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niskatigensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niskatigensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niskatigensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niskatigensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niskatigensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niskatigensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niskatigensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niskatigensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niskatigensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niskatigensimishiniibanan
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niskatigensimishiniibanag
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niskatigensimishiniibaning
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niskatigensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niskatigensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niskatigensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: niskatigenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: niskatigenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: niskatigenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: niskatigenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: niskatigenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: niskatigenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: niskatigenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: niskatigenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: niskatigenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: niskatigenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: niskatigenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: niskatigenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: niskatigenhimishiniibanan
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: niskatigenhimishiniibanag
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: niskatigenhimishiniibaning
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: niskatigenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: niskatigenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px1skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: niskatigenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giskatigensimishinaanibanan
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giskatigensimishinaanibanag
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giskatigensimishinaanibaning
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giskatigensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giskatigensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giskatigensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giskatigensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giskatigensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giskatigensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giskatigensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giskatigensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giskatigensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giskatigensimishiniibanan
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giskatigensimishiniibanag
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giskatigensimishiniibaning
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giskatigensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giskatigensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giskatigensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: giskatigenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: giskatigenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: giskatigenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: giskatigenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: giskatigenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: giskatigenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: giskatigenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: giskatigenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: giskatigenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: giskatigenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: giskatigenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: giskatigenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: giskatigenhimishiniibanan
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: giskatigenhimishiniibanag
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: giskatigenhimishiniibaning
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: giskatigenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: giskatigenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: giskatigenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oskatigensimishinaanibanan
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oskatigensimishinaanibanag
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oskatigensimishinaanibaning
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oskatigensimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oskatigensimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oskatigensimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oskatigensimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oskatigensimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oskatigensimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oskatigensimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oskatigensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oskatigensimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oskatigensimishiniibanan
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oskatigensimishiniibanag
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oskatigensimishiniibaning
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oskatigensimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oskatigensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3skatig+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oskatigensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: oskatigenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: oskatigenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: oskatigenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: oskatigenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: oskatigenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: oskatigenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: oskatigenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: oskatigenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: oskatigenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: oskatigenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: oskatigenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: oskatigenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: oskatigenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: oskatigenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: oskatigenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: oskatigenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: oskatigenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3skatig+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: oskatigenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
